Maryland, session 2026, SB0846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
33–102.
This title applies only in Worcester County.
33–602.
– 1 –

Ch. 835 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) There is a Class B beer license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer at retail at a hotel or
restaurant at the place described in the license for on–premises consumption or on– and
off–premises consumption.
(c) The annual license fees are:
(1) $275 for a 6–day license; and
(2) $350 for a 7–day license.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL AT RETAIL BEER IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE
THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
33–604.
(a) There is a Class D beer license.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the license authorizes the
license holder to sell beer at retail at the place described in the license for on–premises
consumption or on– and off–premises consumption.
(2) A license may not be issued for a drugstore.
(c) The annual license fees are:
(1) $325 for a 6–day license; and
(2) $450 for a 7–day license.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 835
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL AT RETAIL BEER IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE
THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
33–803.
(a) There is:
(1) a Class B beer and wine 6–day license; and
(2) a Class B beer and wine 7–day license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine at a hotel or
restaurant, at retail, at the place described in the license, for on–premises consumption or
on– and off–premises consumption.
(c) The annual license fees are:
(1) $300 for a 6–day license; and
(2) $400 for a 7–day license.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL AT RETAIL BEER AND WINE IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED
OUTSIDE THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE DESIGNATED SPECIAL
EVENT AREA.
33–805.
(a) There is:
(1) a Class D beer and wine 6–day license; and
(2) a Class D beer and wine 7–day license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine, at retail, at the
place described in the license, for on–premises consumption or on– and off–premises
consumption.
– 3 –

Ch. 835 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The license may not be issued for use by a drugstore.
(d) The annual license fees are:
(1) $350 for a 6–day license; and
(2) $500 for a 7–day license.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL AT RETAIL BEER AND WINE IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED
OUTSIDE THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE DESIGNATED SPECIAL
EVENT AREA.
33–902.
(a) There are:
(1) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor 6–day license; and
(2) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor 7–day license.
(b) (1) The Board may issue a 6–day license for use in:
(i) a hotel that has at least 20 rooms and serves meals regularly; or
(ii) a restaurant that has seating at tables for at least 70 individuals.
(2) The Board may issue a 7–day license for use in:
(i) a hotel that:
1. has at least 20 rooms and serves meals regularly;
2. provides services ordinarily found in hotels;
3. has a lobby with a registration and mail desk and seating
facilities; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 835
4. has an enclosed dining area that serves full–course meals
from menus at least two times a day; or
(ii) a restaurant that has:
1. a seating capacity at tables for at least 70 individuals;
2. an enclosed dining area that serves full–course meals from
menus at least two times a day; and
3. average daily receipts from the sale of food that exceed the
average daily receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages during the license term.
(3) The Board may not issue a license under this section for use in a hotel
or restaurant unless the hotel or restaurant is:
(i) operated in a clean and sanitary manner; and
(ii) has proper restroom facilities.
(4) Before a license under this section may be issued for a premises in a
municipality, the license application:
(i) shall be approved by the Board; and
(ii) may be subject to approval by the mayor and town council of the
municipality.
(c) A license under this section authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine,
and liquor, at retail, at the place described in the license, for on–premises consumption or
on– and off–premises consumption.
(d) (1) The annual license fees are:
(i) $1,750 for a 6–day license; and
(ii) $2,000 for a 7–day license.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, all license fees
shall be distributed to the general fund of the county.
(ii) If the licensed premises is located in a municipality, 75% of the
license fees shall be distributed to the municipality.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
– 5 –

Ch. 835 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE
HOLDER TO SELL AT RETAIL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS
THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE
DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
33–904.
(a) There are:
(1) a 6–day Class D beer, wine, and liquor license; and
(2) a 7–day Class D beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board may issue a license under this section only for premises within:
(1) the corporate limits of Ocean City;
(2) the boundary lines of the 10th taxing district;
(3) the area bounded by U.S. Route 50 to the south, Turville Creek and
Herring Creek to the east, St. Martin River to the north, and Maryland Route 589 to the
west;
(4) the area bounded by Maryland Route 589 to the north and east, U.S.
Route 50 to the south, and U.S. Route 113 to the west;
(5) from the intersection of Maryland Route 589 and U.S. Route 50, an area
bounded by a line that extends 1,500 feet south of U.S. Route 50, east to the boundary of
the 10th taxing district, north along the 10th taxing district boundary to U.S. Route 50,
and west to the intersection of Maryland Route 589 and U.S. Route 50;
(6) the corporate limits of the Town of Berlin; and
(7) the corporate limits of the Town of Snow Hill.
(c) A license under this section authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine,
and liquor at retail at the place described in the license for on–premises consumption and
beer and wine for off–premises consumption.
(d) The annual license fees, set by the County Commissioners, may not be less
than:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 835
(1) $3,000 for a 6–day license; and
(2) $3,500 for a 7–day license.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 33–1311 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL AT RETAIL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE
CARRIED OUTSIDE THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE DESIGNATED
SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
33–1105.
(A) THERE IS A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS B BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE OR A CLASS D LICENSE IF THE LICENSED
ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO A SPECIAL
EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN AND FOR USE IN CONJUNCTION WITH A CLASS C PER
DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(C) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL AT RETAIL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE THE
LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT OF THE CLASS B LICENSE OR THE LICENSED
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE CLASS D LICENSE AND INTO THE DESIGNATED SPECIAL
EVENT AREA.
(D) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLYING WITH
ALL APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(E) THE TERM OF THE PERMIT IS THE SAME AS THE TERM OF THE
ASSOCIATED CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATED TO THE ISSUANCE
OF AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE PERMIT, INCLUDING REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(1) THE DESIGNATION OF A SPECIAL EVENT AREA;
– 7 –

Ch. 835 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE HOURS OF SALE;
(3) AGE VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS;
(4) THE USE OF SPECIFIED TO–GO CUPS; AND
(5) ADVERTISING, POSTING OF NOTICE, AND PUBLIC HEARING
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT.
(G) THE FEE FOR THE PERMIT IS $20 PER DAY.
33–1311.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE LICENSE ENTITLES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO ALLOW BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR SOLD BY A HOLDER OF A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT UNDER §
33–1105 OF THIS TITLE TO ENTER A DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA DESCRIBED
IN THE LICENSE FOR A PERIOD NOT EXCEEDING 7 CONSECUTIVE DAYS.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A MUNICIPALITY IN THE
COUNTY:
(1) THE TOWN OF BERLIN;
(2) POCOMOKE CITY; OR
(3) THE TOWN OF SNOW HILL.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATED TO THE ISSUANCE
OF AND REQUIREMENTS FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(1) THE DESIGNATION OF A SPECIAL EVENT AREA;
(2) THE HOURS OF SALE;
(3) AGE VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS;
(4) THE USE OF SPECIFIED TO–GO CUPS;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 835
(5) ADVERTISING, POSTING OF NOTICE, AND PUBLIC HEARING
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE LICENSE AND ANY ASSOCIATED TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT
PERMIT; AND
(6) PUBLIC SAFETY AND EVENT SECURITY REQUIREMENTS.
(E) THE FEE FOR THE LICENSE IS $45 PER DAY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 9 –